Nevada, session 83, SB242.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 111 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An investment company shall not enter into an executory
contract for the purchase of residential property that is listed for
sale unless the property has been so listed for at least 30 days.
2. A contract entered into in violation of subsection 1 is
voidable by the seller at any time before the contract is fully
executed.
-
*SB242*

– 2 –
3. For the purposes of this section, “investment company”
means a corporation, trust, limited-liability company, partnership,
association, fund or similar entity which is engaged in or proposes
to engage in the business of investing the pooled capital of
investors.
Sec. 2. The provisions of this act apply to contracts entered
into on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB242*